Maryland, session 2025, HB0122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–102.
(a) Each county shall have a police accountability board to:
(1) hold quarterly meetings with heads of law enforcement agencies and
otherwise work with law enforcement agencies and the county government to improve
matters of policing;
(2) appoint civilian members to charging committees and trial boards;
(3) receive complaints of police misconduct filed by members of the public
AND POLICE OFFICERS; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0122*

HOUSE BILL 122
(4) (i) on a quarterly basis, review outcomes of disciplinary matters
considered by charging committees; and
(ii) on or before December 31 each year, submit a report to the
governing body of the county that:
1. identifies any trends in the disciplinary process of police
officers in the county; and
2. makes recommendations on changes to policy that would
improve police accountability in the county.
(b) (1) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the local
governing body shall:
1. establish the membership of a police accountability board;
2. establish the budget and staff for a police accountability
board;
3. appoint a chair of the police accountability board who has
relevant experience to the position; and
4. establish the procedures for record keeping by a police
accountability board.
(ii) An active police officer may not be a member of a police
accountability board.
(2) To the extent practicable, the membership of a police accountability
board shall reflect the racial, gender, and cultural diversity of the county.
(c) (1) A complaint of police misconduct filed with a police accountability board
shall include:
(i) the name of the police officer accused of misconduct;
(ii) a description of the facts on which the complaint is based; and
(iii) contact information of the complainant or a person filing on
behalf of the complainant for investigative follow–up.
(2) A complaint need not be notarized.
(d) A complaint of police misconduct filed with a police accountability board shall
be forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency within 3 days after receipt by the
board.

HOUSE BILL 122 3
3–113.
(a) The investigating unit of a law enforcement agency shall immediately review
a complaint [by a member of the public] alleging police officer misconduct.
(b) An administrative charging committee shall review and make a determination
or ask for further review within 30 days after completion of the investigating unit’s review.
(c) The process of review by the investigating unit through disposition by the
administrative charging committee shall be completed within 1 year and 1 day after the
filing of a complaint [by a citizen].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.